Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.200

Dissolution of district by resolution—Disposition of property.

If the board of county commissioners finds, following a public hearing or hearings, that the continued existence of a district would no longer serve the purposes of this chapter, it may by resolution order the district dissolved. If there is any property owned by the district at the time of dissolution, the board of county commissioners shall have such property sold pursuant to the provisions of chapter 36.34 RCW, as now law or hereafter amended. The proceeds from such sale shall be applied to the county current expense fund.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 20.]